Utah statutes.
16-16-701.   Authority.
In this part, "marketing contract" means a contract between a limited
cooperative association and another person, that need not be a patron member:
(1)  requiring the other person to sell, or deliver for sale or marketing on
the person's behalf, a specified part of the person's products, commodities,
or goods exclusively to or through the association or any facilities furnished
by the association; or
(2)  authorizing the association to act for the person in any manner with
respect to the products, commodities, or goods.
